Utah statutes.
31A-19a-408.   Procedures for workers' compensation tiered rate filings.

(1)  Notwithstanding Section 31A-19a-214 and subject to the other provisions of this section, a workers' compensation insurer may file with the commissioner a rate filing for workers' compensation insurance that provides for a plan with more than one rate tier for a single insurer or an insurer group with common ownership if the filing shows that:

(a)  each tier is established on underwriting rules that are based on criteria that would lead to a logical distinguishing of potential risk; and

(b)  supporting actuarial analysis or other information that shows a clear distinction between the following for each tier:

(i)  expected losses and expenses; and

(ii)  actual losses and expenses.

(2)  A workers' compensation insurer shall file with the commissioner an update of the actuarial analysis or other information required under Subsection (1)(b) at least every three years.

(3)  A workers' compensation insurer may apply underwriting expertise and judgment in the tier placement process, except that underwriting expertise and judgment shall:

(a)  be applied in a prudent manner; and

(b)  when applied, be fair, reasonable, and fully documented.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 2011 General Session

